South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3543.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 1, Title 39 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 39-1-100.  (A) The restroom facilities in any place of business in this State of a retailer selling tangible personal property must be available for use by purchasers or prospective purchasers entering this place of business upon their request. Where there is more than one restroom in that place of business, a restroom may be designated for use by one particular sex. (B) The provisions of this section are supplemental to any other provisions of law requiring restroom facilities in public restaurants and similar establishments. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----